Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2774
Income tax; Tax Commissioner; rules and regulations.

The Tax Commissioner may prescribe regulations and instructions requiring returns of information to be made and filed not inconsistent with the information returns required by the laws of the United States.

Laws 1967, c. 487, § 74, p. 1603.